Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF1885.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 541.073, subdivision 3, is amended to read: Subd. 3. Applicabilitynew text begin ; retroactive applicationnew text end . new text begin (a) new text end This section applies to an action for damages commenced against a person who was a cause of the plaintiff's damages either by (1) committing sexual abuse against the plaintiff, or (2) negligence. new text begin (b) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, if the plaintiff was under the age of 18 at the time of the alleged abuse, this section applies to actions pending or commenced on or after August 1, 2025, including actions that were time-barred prior to August 1, 2025. new text end